District of Columbia statutes.
8-1825.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Africanized bee” means a hybrid variety of Apis mellifera produced by the cross-breeding of the aggressive African honey bee Apis mellifera scutellata with a European honey bee subspecies.

(2)

“Apiary” means a place where a colony is kept.

(3)

“Bee disease” means an abnormal condition resulting from action by a parasite, predator, or infectious agent.

(4)

“Brood” means the embryo and egg, larva, and pupa stages of a bee.

(5)

“Colony” means a hive and its equipment and appurtenances, including bees, brood, comb, pollen, and honey.

(6)

“Comb” means the assemblage of cells containing a living stage of a bee at a time prior to emergence as an adult.

(7)

“Department” means the District Department of the Environment.

(7A)

“Director” means the Director of the District Department of the Environment.

(8)

“Hive” means a container used for the housing of a colony.

(9)

“Honey bee” means Apis mellifera or another species designated as suitable for an urban environment by the Director.

Apis mellifera

(10)

“Multi-unit building” means a building with at least 4 separate housing units.

(11)

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, trust, association, firm, joint stock company, organization, commission, or any other legal entity.

(12)

Repealed.

History

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 212, 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 411(a), 61 DCR 8045

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 added (7A); substituted “used” for “intended” in (8); rewrote (9); inserted “building” following “Multi-unit” in (10); substituted “legal entity” for “private entity” in (11); and repealed (12).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 411 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.